Missouri, session 2026, HB2734.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.990 and 67.993, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.990 and 67.993, to read as follows:
67.990. 1. The governing body of any county or city not within a county may, upon
approval of a majority of the qualified voters of such county or city voting thereon, levy and
collect a tax not to exceed [five] ten cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation[, or
in any county of the first classification with more than eighty-five thousand nine hundred but
less than eighty-six thousand inhabitants, the governing body may, upon approval of a
majority of the qualified voters of the county voting thereon, levy and collect a tax not to
exceed ten cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation] upon all taxable property
within the county or city or for the purpose of providing services to persons sixty years of age
or older. The tax so levied shall be collected along with other county or city taxes, in the
manner provided by law. All funds collected for this purpose shall be deposited in a special
fund for the provision of services for persons sixty years of age or older, and shall be used for
no other purpose except those purposes authorized in sections 67.990 to 67.995. Deposits in
the fund shall be expended only upon approval of the board of directors established in section
67.993, if in a county, and only in accordance with the fund budget approved by the county
governing body.
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this section shall be imposed shall be
submitted in substantially the following form:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2734 2
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Shall ______ (name of county/city) levy a tax of ______ cents per each
one hundred dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of providing
services to persons sixty years of age or older?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
67.993. 1. Upon the approval of the tax authorized by section 67.990 by the voters of
the county or city not within a county, the tax so approved shall be imposed upon all taxable
property within the county or city and the proceeds therefrom shall be deposited in a special
fund, to be known as the "Senior Citizens' Services Fund", which is hereby established within
the county or city treasury. No moneys in the senior citizens' services fund shall be spent until
the board of directors provided for in subsection 2 of this section has been appointed and has
taken office.
2. Upon approval of the tax authorized by section 67.990 by the voters of the county
or city, the governing body of the county or the mayor of the city shall appoint a board of
directors consisting of seven directors, who shall be selected from the county or city at large
and shall, as nearly as practicable, represent the various groups to be served by the board.
Each director shall be a resident of the county or city. Each director shall be appointed to
serve for a term of four years and until [his] a successor is duly appointed and qualified;
except that, of the directors first appointed, one director shall be appointed for a term of one
year, two directors shall be appointed for a term of two years, two directors shall be appointed
for a term of three years, and two directors shall be appointed for a term of four years.
Directors may be reappointed. All vacancies on the board of directors shall be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term by the governing body of the county or mayor of the city.
The directors shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for
all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties from the
moneys in the senior citizens' services fund.
3. The administrative control and management of the funds in the senior citizens'
services fund and all programs to be funded therefrom shall rest solely with the board of
directors appointed under subsection 2 of this section, except, in counties, the budget for the
senior citizens' services fund shall be approved by the governing body of the county prior to
making of any payments from the fund in any fiscal year. The board of directors shall use the
funds in the senior citizens' services fund to provide programs which will improve the health,
nutrition, and quality of life of persons who are sixty years of age or older. The budget may
allocate funds for operational and capital needs to senior-related programs in the county or
city in which such property taxes are collected. No funds in the senior citizens' services fund
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any political purpose. In providing such services, the

HB 2734 3
board of directors may contract with any person to provide services relating, in whole or in
part, to the services which the board itself may provide under this section, and for such
purpose may expend the tax proceeds derived from the tax authorized by section 67.990.
4. The board of directors shall elect a [chairman] chair, vice [chairman] chair, and
such other officers as it deems necessary; shall establish eligibility requirements for the
programs it furnishes; and shall do all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of
sections 67.990 to 67.995. A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum.
5. The board of directors, with the approval of the governing body of the county or
city, may accept any gift of property or money for the use and benefit of the persons to be
served through the programs established and funded under sections 67.990 to 67.995 and may
sell or exchange any such property so long as such sale or exchange is in the best interests of
the programs provided under sections 67.990 to 67.995 and the proceeds from such sale or
exchange are used exclusively to fund such programs. For a city not within a county, the
board of directors may solicit, accept, and expend grants from private or public entities and
enter into agreements to effectuate such grants so long as the transaction is in the best interest
of the programs provided by the board and the proceeds are used exclusively to fund such
programs.
6. (1) Accreditation attained by a board of directors established under this
section shall be subject to the following:
(a) Such accreditation shall be through a statewide nonprofit organization
dedicated to advancing the well-being of older adults across the state and specifically
supporting senior citizens' services funding levied in such county;
(b) Such statewide nonprofit organization approving the program and providing
accreditation shall provide a certificate of completion to each board of directors that has
completed the training program; and
(c) Accreditation shall be renewed on an annual basis.
(2) A board of directors that attains accreditation under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall pay an annual fee to such statewide nonprofit organization. Such fee
shall be an amount equal to one percent of the revenues derived annually from the tax
imposed under section 67.990.
(3) The state shall recognize accreditation attained under subdivision (1) of this
subsection as best-practice training for board members to ensure transparency and
proper administration of the taxpayer moneys collected from the tax imposed under
section 67.990.
(4) A board of directors established after December 31, 2015, shall attain the
accreditation described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

HB 2734 4
(5) A board of directors established before January 1, 2016, may attain the
accreditation described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✔